Massachusetts, session 194th, S2227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 15BBBBBB
the following section:-
Section 15CCCCCC. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting aside
April thirteenth as 413 Day, to promote tourism, economic development, and the unique culture
of western Massachusetts and recommending that said day be observed in an appropriate manner
by the people.
of 1